ctranslate-ol/frontend/dictionaries/dsb_DE.aff
FLAG num
SFX 336 Y 25
SFX 336 0 ach .
SFX 336 0 achmej .
SFX 336 0 achmy .
SFX 336 0 achu .
SFX 336 0 am .
SFX 336 0 ami .
SFX 336 0 ašo .
SFX 336 0 aštej .
SFX 336 0 ašćo .
SFX 336 0 e .
SFX 336 0 i .
SFX 336 0 im .
SFX 336 0 imej .
SFX 336 0 imy .
SFX 336 0 itej .
SFX 336 0 iśo .
SFX 336 0 iš .
SFX 336 0 mej .
SFX 336 0 my .
SFX 336 0 oma .
SFX 336 0 ow .
SFX 336 0 owu .
SFX 336 0 tej .
SFX 336 0 u .
SFX 336 0 śo .
SFX 337 Y 11
SFX 337 0 a .
SFX 337 0 ach .
SFX 337 0 am .
SFX 337 0 ami .
SFX 337 0 i .
SFX 337 0 imej .
SFX 337 0 imy .
SFX 337 0 itej .
SFX 337 0 iśo .
SFX 337 0 ow .
SFX 337 0 u .
SFX 338 Y 11
SFX 338 0 a .
SFX 338 0 ach .
SFX 338 0 am .
SFX 338 0 ami .
SFX 338 0 i .
SFX 338 0 imej .
SFX 338 0 imy .
SFX 338 0 itej .
SFX 338 0 iśo .
SFX 338 0 ow .
SFX 338 0 u .
SFX 339 Y 25
SFX 339 0 ach .
SFX 339 0 achmej .
SFX 339 0 achmy .
SFX 339 0 achu .
SFX 339 0 am .
SFX 339 0 ami .
SFX 339 0 ašo .
SFX 339 0 aštej .
SFX 339 0 ašćo .
SFX 339 0 e .
SFX 339 0 i .
SFX 339 0 im .
SFX 339 0 imej .
SFX 339 0 imy .
SFX 339 0 itej .
SFX 339 0 iśo .
SFX 339 0 iš .
SFX 339 0 mej .
SFX 339 0 my .
SFX 339 0 oma .
SFX 339 0 ow .
SFX 339 0 owu .
SFX 339 0 tej .
SFX 339 0 u .
SFX 339 0 ćo .
SFX 340 Y 22
SFX 340 0 ach .
SFX 340 0 achmej .
SFX 340 0 achmy .
SFX 340 0 achu .
SFX 340 0 ašo .
SFX 340 0 aštej .
SFX 340 0 ašćo .
SFX 340 0 e .
SFX 340 0 ech .
SFX 340 0 echmej .
SFX 340 0 echmy .
SFX 340 0 echu .
SFX 340 0 ešo .
SFX 340 0 eštej .
SFX 340 0 ešćo .
SFX 340 0 o .
SFX 340 0 om .
SFX 340 0 omej .
SFX 340 0 omy .
SFX 340 0 otej .
SFX 340 0 ośo .
SFX 340 0 oš .
SFX 341 Y 12
SFX 341 0 ach .
SFX 341 0 am .
SFX 341 0 ami .
SFX 341 0 i .
SFX 341 0 im .
SFX 341 0 imej .
SFX 341 0 imy .
SFX 341 0 itej .
SFX 341 0 iśo .
SFX 341 0 iš .
SFX 341 0 ow .
SFX 341 0 y .
SFX 342 Y 9
SFX 342 0 aju .
SFX 342 0 am .
SFX 342 0 ama .
SFX 342 0 ami .
SFX 342 0 as .
SFX 342 0 ich .
SFX 342 0 im .
SFX 342 0 ima .
SFX 342 0 imi .
SFX 343 Y 17
SFX 343 0 a .
SFX 343 0 ach .
SFX 343 0 am .
SFX 343 0 ami .
SFX 343 0 oma .
SFX 343 0 ow .
SFX 343 0 owu .
SFX 343 0 u .
SFX 343 0 y .
SFX 343 0 yjo .
SFX 343 0 yjom .
SFX 343 0 yjomej .
SFX 343 0 yjomy .
SFX 343 0 yjotej .
SFX 343 0 yjośo .
SFX 343 0 yjoš .
SFX 343 0 yju .
SFX 344 Y 15
SFX 344 0 i .
SFX 344 0 im .
SFX 344 0 imej .
SFX 344 0 imy .
SFX 344 0 itej .
SFX 344 0 iśo .
SFX 344 0 iš .
SFX 344 0 yjo .
SFX 344 0 yjom .
SFX 344 0 yjomej .
SFX 344 0 yjomy .
SFX 344 0 yjotej .
SFX 344 0 yjośo .
SFX 344 0 yjoš .
SFX 344 0 yju .
SFX 345 Y 10
SFX 345 0 e .
SFX 345 0 ego .
SFX 345 0 ej .
SFX 345 0 eju .
SFX 345 0 em .
SFX 345 0 emu .
SFX 345 0 ich .
SFX 345 0 im .
SFX 345 0 ima .
SFX 345 0 imi .
SFX 346 Y 11
SFX 346 0 e .
SFX 346 0 ego .
SFX 346 0 ej .
SFX 346 0 eju .
SFX 346 0 em .
SFX 346 0 emu .
SFX 346 0 i .
SFX 346 0 ich .
SFX 346 0 im .
SFX 346 0 ima .
SFX 346 0 imi .
SFX 347 Y 12
SFX 347 0 a .
SFX 347 0 ach .
SFX 347 0 am .
SFX 347 0 ami .
SFX 347 0 ej .
SFX 347 0 eje .
SFX 347 0 eju .
SFX 347 0 oma .
SFX 347 0 ow .
SFX 347 0 owu .
SFX 347 0 u .
SFX 347 0 y .
SFX 348 Y 12
SFX 348 0 a .
SFX 348 0 ach .
SFX 348 0 am .
SFX 348 0 ami .
SFX 348 0 ej .
SFX 348 0 eje .
SFX 348 0 eju .
SFX 348 0 oma .
SFX 348 0 ow .
SFX 348 0 owu .
SFX 348 0 u .
SFX 348 0 y .
SFX 349 Y 13
SFX 349 0 a .
SFX 349 0 ach .
SFX 349 0 am .
SFX 349 0 ami .
SFX 349 0 e .
SFX 349 0 eju .
SFX 349 0 i .
SFX 349 0 im .
SFX 349 0 imi .
SFX 349 0 oma .
SFX 349 0 ow .
SFX 349 0 owu .
SFX 349 0 u .
SFX 350 Y 13
SFX 350 0 ach .
SFX 350 0 am .
SFX 350 0 ami .
SFX 350 0 e .
SFX 350 0 ego .
SFX 350 0 ej .
SFX 350 0 eju .
SFX 350 0 em .
SFX 350 0 emu .
SFX 350 0 ow .
SFX 350 0 y .
SFX 350 0 ym .
SFX 350 0 yma .
SFX 351 Y 12
SFX 351 0 a .
SFX 351 0 ach .
SFX 351 0 am .
SFX 351 0 ami .
SFX 351 0 e .
SFX 351 0 eju .
SFX 351 0 oju .
SFX 351 0 om .
SFX 351 0 oma .
SFX 351 0 ow .
SFX 351 0 owu .
SFX 351 0 u .
SFX 352 Y 11
SFX 352 0 a .
SFX 352 0 ach .
SFX 352 0 am .
SFX 352 0 ami .
SFX 352 0 i .
SFX 352 0 imi .
SFX 352 0 oju .
SFX 352 0 om .
SFX 352 0 oma .
SFX 352 0 owu .
SFX 352 0 u .
SFX 353 Y 12
SFX 353 0 a .
SFX 353 0 ach .
SFX 353 0 am .
SFX 353 0 ami .
SFX 353 0 e .
SFX 353 0 i .
SFX 353 0 imi .
SFX 353 0 oju .
SFX 353 0 om .
SFX 353 0 oma .
SFX 353 0 owu .
SFX 353 0 u .
SFX 354 Y 15
SFX 354 0 a .
SFX 354 0 ach .
SFX 354 0 am .
SFX 354 0 ami .
SFX 354 0 e .
SFX 354 0 eju .
SFX 354 0 i .
SFX 354 0 im .
SFX 354 0 o .
SFX 354 0 oju .
SFX 354 0 om .
SFX 354 0 oma .
SFX 354 0 ow .
SFX 354 0 owu .
SFX 354 0 u .
SFX 355 Y 12
SFX 355 0 a .
SFX 355 0 ach .
SFX 355 0 am .
SFX 355 0 ami .
SFX 355 0 e .
SFX 355 0 imi .
SFX 355 0 oju .
SFX 355 0 om .
SFX 355 0 oma .
SFX 355 0 ow .
SFX 355 0 owu .
SFX 355 0 u .
SFX 356 Y 16
SFX 356 0 ijo .
SFX 356 0 ijom .
SFX 356 0 ijomej .
SFX 356 0 ijomy .
SFX 356 0 ijotej .
SFX 356 0 ijośo .
SFX 356 0 ijoš .
SFX 356 0 iju .
SFX 356 0 yjo .
SFX 356 0 yjom .
SFX 356 0 yjomej .
SFX 356 0 yjomy .
SFX 356 0 yjotej .
SFX 356 0 yjośo .
SFX 356 0 yjoš .
SFX 356 0 yju .
SFX 357 Y 12
SFX 357 0 e .
SFX 357 0 ej .
SFX 357 0 eje .
SFX 357 0 eju .
SFX 357 0 en .
SFX 357 0 ich .
SFX 357 0 im .
SFX 357 0 ima .
SFX 357 0 o .
SFX 357 0 ogo .
SFX 357 0 omu .
SFX 357 0 u .
SFX 358 Y 10
SFX 358 0 i .
SFX 358 0 imej .
SFX 358 0 imy .
SFX 358 0 itej .
SFX 358 0 iśo .
SFX 358 0 mej .
SFX 358 0 my .
SFX 358 0 tej .
SFX 358 0 u .
SFX 358 0 śo .
SFX 359 Y 27
SFX 359 0 a .
SFX 359 0 ach .
SFX 359 0 achmej .
SFX 359 0 achmy .
SFX 359 0 achu .
SFX 359 0 ašo .
SFX 359 0 aštej .
SFX 359 0 ašćo .
SFX 359 0 e .
SFX 359 0 ego .
SFX 359 0 ej .
SFX 359 0 eje .
SFX 359 0 eju .
SFX 359 0 em .
SFX 359 0 emu .
SFX 359 0 i .
SFX 359 0 ich .
SFX 359 0 im .
SFX 359 0 ima .
SFX 359 0 imi .
SFX 359 0 m .
SFX 359 0 mej .
SFX 359 0 my .
SFX 359 0 tej .
SFX 359 0 u .
SFX 359 0 śo .
SFX 359 0 š .
SFX 360 Y 11
SFX 360 0 i .
SFX 360 0 imej .
SFX 360 0 imy .
SFX 360 0 itej .
SFX 360 0 iśo .
SFX 360 0 mej .
SFX 360 0 my .
SFX 360 0 tej .
SFX 360 0 u .
SFX 360 0 ě .
SFX 360 0 śo .
SFX 361 Y 12
SFX 361 0 e .
SFX 361 0 i .
SFX 361 0 im .
SFX 361 0 imej .
SFX 361 0 imy .
SFX 361 0 itej .
SFX 361 0 iśo .
SFX 361 0 iš .
SFX 361 0 mej .
SFX 361 0 my .
SFX 361 0 tej .
SFX 361 0 ćo .
SFX 362 Y 11
SFX 362 0 i .
SFX 362 0 im .
SFX 362 0 imej .
SFX 362 0 imy .
SFX 362 0 itej .
SFX 362 0 iśo .
SFX 362 0 iš .
SFX 362 0 mej .
SFX 362 0 my .
SFX 362 0 tej .
SFX 362 0 śo .
SFX 363 Y 12
SFX 363 0 e .
SFX 363 0 i .
SFX 363 0 im .
SFX 363 0 imej .
SFX 363 0 imy .
SFX 363 0 itej .
SFX 363 0 iśo .
SFX 363 0 iš .
SFX 363 0 mej .
SFX 363 0 my .
SFX 363 0 tej .
SFX 363 0 śo .
SFX 364 Y 12
SFX 364 0 a .
SFX 364 0 ach .
SFX 364 0 am .
SFX 364 0 ami .
SFX 364 0 e .
SFX 364 0 oju .
SFX 364 0 om .
SFX 364 0 oma .
SFX 364 0 ow .
SFX 364 0 owu .
SFX 364 0 u .
SFX 364 0 ymi .
SFX 365 Y 12
SFX 365 0 a .
SFX 365 0 ach .
SFX 365 0 am .
SFX 365 0 ami .
SFX 365 0 o .
SFX 365 0 oju .
SFX 365 0 om .
SFX 365 0 oma .
SFX 365 0 ow .
SFX 365 0 owu .
SFX 365 0 u .
SFX 365 0 ymi .
SFX 366 Y 12
SFX 366 0 a .
SFX 366 0 ach .
SFX 366 0 am .
SFX 366 0 ami .
SFX 366 0 oju .
SFX 366 0 om .
SFX 366 0 oma .
SFX 366 0 ow .
SFX 366 0 owu .
SFX 366 0 u .
SFX 366 0 y .
SFX 366 0 ymi .
SFX 367 Y 13
SFX 367 0 a .
SFX 367 0 ach .
SFX 367 0 am .
SFX 367 0 ami .
SFX 367 0 e .
SFX 367 0 oju .
SFX 367 0 om .
SFX 367 0 oma .
SFX 367 0 ow .
SFX 367 0 owu .
SFX 367 0 u .
SFX 367 0 y .
SFX 367 0 ymi .
SFX 368 Y 13
SFX 368 0 a .
SFX 368 0 ach .
SFX 368 0 am .
SFX 368 0 ami .
SFX 368 0 o .
SFX 368 0 oju .
SFX 368 0 om .
SFX 368 0 oma .
SFX 368 0 ow .
SFX 368 0 owu .
SFX 368 0 u .
SFX 368 0 y .
SFX 368 0 yma .
SFX 369 Y 13
SFX 369 0 ach .
SFX 369 0 am .
SFX 369 0 ami .
SFX 369 0 ijo .
SFX 369 0 ijom .
SFX 369 0 ijomej .
SFX 369 0 ijomy .
SFX 369 0 ijotej .
SFX 369 0 ijośo .
SFX 369 0 ijoš .
SFX 369 0 iju .
SFX 369 0 ow .
SFX 369 0 y .
SFX 370 Y 14
SFX 370 0 a .
SFX 370 0 ach .
SFX 370 0 am .
SFX 370 0 ami .
SFX 370 0 e .
SFX 370 0 mej .
SFX 370 0 my .
SFX 370 0 oma .
SFX 370 0 ow .
SFX 370 0 owu .
SFX 370 0 tej .
SFX 370 0 u .
SFX 370 0 y .
SFX 370 0 ćo .
