ctranslate-ol/frontend/dictionaries/dsb_DE.dic
Bezkojsk/1,346
Bórkojsk/1,346
Bórkowsk/1,346
Bórojsk/1,346
Błotomłyńsk/1,346
Derbnojsk/1,346
Dešańsk/1,346
Dostojewsk/1,346
Fusowsk/1,346
Goeth/1,350
Grabowsk/1,346
Gółkojsk/1,346
Gółkowsk/1,346
Hurask/1,346
Huzk/1,346
Jabłońsk/1,346
Jaworsk/1,346
Kamjen/347
Kibušańsk/1,346
Kopańsk/1,346
Kowalsk/1,346
Kowaŕsk/1,346
Kórintsk/1,346
Kóslowsk/1,346
Mukwarj/1,351
Módł/1,348
Nietzsch/1,350
Popojsk/1,346
Popowsk/1,346
Purikowsk/1,345
Półměst/365
Rědk/1,346
SA-muž/364
Skalsk/1,346
Wuzk/1,346
Wólk/1,346
Wótšowcańsk/1,346
Zagorsk/1,346
Zulumusk/1,346
acetatžyź/1,354
cesć/339
chrjašć/361
chwalob/362
darb/362
daw/362
derb/362
dobroś/339
dopśim/358
drišć/361
dwój/359
dymow/362
eksmusk/1,346
euro-pjenjez/364
europjenjez/364
gerc/364
gjarś/339
gjarź/339
gownow/362
groź/339
gruź/339
gusć/339
gódnosć/339
gólc/367
gósć/352
j/1,357
jacmjeńsk/1,346
jaw/362
ješć/339
jěz/370
kameramuž/364
kamjen/341
knydl/1,355
kopjenj/1,351
krowaŕsk/1,346
kśew/362
kśip/362
leś/361
lubosć/339
lutosć/339
luź/353
lěp/362
mudrosć/339
muž/364
mócnj/1,340
měst/365
młoź/339
n/1,342
neandertalsk/1,346
njebab/362
njebarw/362
njeblab/362
njebratšow/362
njeból/363
njecarob/362
njecazow/362
njecerw/362
njecesć/339
njechrjašć/361
njechrom/362
njechrop/362
njechudob/362
njechwalob/362
njecop/362
njedarb/362
njedaw/362
njederb/362
njedobroś/339
njedopśim/358
njedrapaw/362
njedrastw/362
njedrišć/361
njedrob/362
njedup/362
njedym/362
njedymow/362
njegjarb/362
njegownow/362
njegub/362
njegódnosć/339
njegłup/362
njejadušyw/362
njejaw/362
njejuchow/362
njekip/362
njekjarm/362
njekop/362
njekopśiw/362
njekrow/362
njekurjawkow/362
njekśew/362
njekśip/362
njekśiw/362
njekšaw/362
njekšom/362
njekšupow/362
njelarb/362
njeleś/361
njelubosć/339
njelěp/362
njemjerw/362
njemudrosć/339
njemukow/362
njemócnj/1,340
njemóraw/362
njenajm/358
njenałp/362
njenjeroź/361
njenow/362
njenunw/362
njeparow/362
njepintś/361
njepišć/361
njepjerjow/362
njepjerkow/362
njepjerow/362
njepjerź/361
njeplamp/362
njeplišć/361
njepuchoŕkow/362
njepódejm/358
njepódnajm/358
njepódob/362
njepódpśim/358
njepódružb/362
njepójaw/362
njepójm/358
njepław/362
njepśedwiź/361
njepśejm/358
njepśenajm/358
njepśepśim/358
njepśim/358
njepśinajm/358
njepśipśim/358
njepśizajm/358
njerob/362
njerownosć/339
njerozdym/362
njeroź/339
njerožow/362
njesejź/361
njesněgow/362
njeswjerb/362
njesłab/362
njetešnj/1,340
njetob/362
njetryšć/361
njetucnj/1,340
njetup/362
njetwardnj/1,340
njetšub/362
njewiź/361
njewjerś/361
njewobejm/358
njewobpśim/358
njewobsejź/361
njewoklep/362
njewopśim/358
njewrjašć/361
njewugór/1,356
njewujm/358
njewupśim/358
njewuzejm/358
njewónoź/361
njewótejm/358
njewótnajm/358
njewótpójm/358
njewótwiź/361
njewěsć/339
njewšow/362
njezapśim/358
njezasromoś/361
njezatokon/1,344
njezawiź/361
njezejm/358
njezgór/1,356
njezub/362
njełakom/362
njełup/362
njeśamnj/1,340
njeśišć/361
nješkóź/361
nješlamow/362
nješlimow/362
nješylaw/362
nješćerb/362
nježałob/362
nježenj/1,340
nježydnj/1,340
nježłob/362
nož/364
pakosć/339
panjewóz/364
pintś/361
pišć/361
pjakajaŕsk/1,346
pjenjez/364
pjerź/361
plamp/362
pomsć/339
pódejm/358
pódnajm/358
pódpśim/358
pójaw/362
pójm/358
pójěz/370
pólen/337
pěsć/339
pěź/339
płaś/339
pśedwiź/361
pśenajm/358
pśepśim/358
pśim/360
pśinajm/358
pśipśim/358
pśiwěr/1,343
pśizajm/358
ros/370
rownosć/339
rozgriw/362
smjerś/339
sobuluź/353
sol/336
starosć/339
stwjerś/339
supermusk/1,346
swěźenj/1,351
tešnj/1,340
tryšć/361
tucnj/1,340
turkow/362
twardnj/1,340
tšoj/359
v-muž/364
wab/362
wezymsk/1,346
wiź/361
wjerś/361
wobejm/358
wobpśim/358
wobsejź/361
wobwóc/1,368
wobwócyj/1,354
wopśim/358
woł/366
wrjašć/361
wugór/1,356
wujm/358
wuměr/369
wupśim/358
wusn/1,338
wuzejm/358
wónoź/361
wóseb/362
wótejm/358
wótnajm/358
wótpójm/358
wótwiź/361
wěsć/339
zapśim/358
zasromoś/361
zatokon/1,344
zawisć/339
zejm/358
zgór/1,356
Ü-wóz/364
Ćišinsk/1,346
Łužysk/1,346
łakosć/339
łoź/339
łup/362
Śańk/1,346
Śěžk/1,346
śamnj/1,340
śernj/1,351
šerjenj/1,351
škóź/361
šlamow/362
šylep/362
źiśiźiś/1,349
Žemrjojsk/1,346
Žylojsk/1,346
žałosć/339
žołś/339
žydnj/1,340
žyź/1,354
